Maryland, session 2026, HB0990.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–709.1.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0990*

HOUSE BILL 990
(2) “Brownfield” has the meaning stated in § 7–207 of this title.
(3) “Certified SREC” means a solar renewable energy credit generated by
a certified system.
(4) “Certified system” means a solar energy generating system certified by
the Commission under the Program to generate certified SRECs with the compliance value
specified in subsection (c) of this section.
(5) “Program” means the Small Solar Energy Generating System Incentive
Program.
(d) To be eligible for certification under the Program, a solar energy generating
system shall:
(1) be located in the State;
(2) be eligible for inclusion in meeting the renewable energy portfolio
standard;
(3) have a generating capacity of 5 megawatts or less, as measured by the
alternating current rating of the system’s inverter;
(4) be placed in service between July 1, 2024, and January 1, [2028] 2031,
inclusive; and
(5) be one of the following types of systems:
(i) a system with a generating capacity of 20 kilowatts or less, as
measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter;
(ii) a system with a generating capacity of 2 megawatts or less, as
measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter, if the system is used
for aggregate net metering; or
(iii) a system with a generating capacity of between 20 kilowatts and
5 megawatts, as measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter, if the
system is located on or over:
1. a rooftop;
2. a parking canopy;
3. a brownfield; or
4. a water retention pond or quarry currently or previously
designated for industrial use.

HOUSE BILL 990 3
(g) The total amount of in–State generating capacity for certified systems, as
measured by the alternating current rating of the systems’ inverters, under the Program
may not exceed:
(1) 300 megawatts for systems with a generating capacity of less than 20
kilowatts, as measured by the alternating current rating of the system’s inverter; and
(2) [270] 540 megawatts for systems with a generating capacity of between
20 kilowatts and 5 megawatts, as measured by the alternating current rating of the
system’s inverter.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.